Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3722.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 201.13, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Deceased voter removal. new text end new text begin The county auditor must remove a voter from the statewide voter registration system after changing the voter's status to "deceased." new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin RETROACTIVE DECEASED VOTER REMOVAL.new text end new text begin The county auditor must remove all voters with "deceased" status from the statewide voter registration system by June 1, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end